Washington statutes.
RCW 1.80.050

Construction and application.

This chapter must be construed and applied:

(1) To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2) To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3) To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

[ 2020 c 57 s 6.]